Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.345

Persons licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW exempt from salesperson registration requirements.

Persons licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW are exempt from the camping resort salesperson registration requirements of this chapter for camping resort contracts offered through the licensed brokerage.

[ 1988 c 159 s 9.]